Nebraska, session 109, LB78A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $830,000 from the Domestic
Violence and Sex Trafficking Survivor Housing Assistance Fund for FY2025-26 and
(2) $1,135,000 from the Domestic Violence and Sex Trafficking Survivor Housing
Assistance Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of Health and Human Services,
for Program 514, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 78,
One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$830,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $1,135,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-